Illinois, session 104th, HB2674.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Lottery Law is amended by changing 5Sections 7.1, 9.1, 10.1, 10.6, 19, 20, 20.1, 24, and 27 as 6follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1605/7.1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1157.1)8    Sec. 7.1. The Department shall promulgate such rules and 9regulations governing the establishment and operation of a 10State lottery as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes 11of this Act. Such rules and regulations shall be subject to the 12provisions of The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The 13Department shall issue written game rules, play instructions, 14directives, operations manuals, brochures, or any other 15publications necessary to conduct specific games, as 16authorized by rule by the Department. Any written game rules, 17play instructions, directives, operations manuals, brochures, 18or other game publications issued by the Department that 19relate to a specific lottery game shall be maintained as a 20public record in the Department's principal office, and made 21available for public inspection and copying but shall be 22exempt from the rulemaking procedures of the Illinois 23Administrative Procedure Act. However, when such written   HB2674- 2 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1materials contain any policy of general applicability, the 2Department shall formulate and adopt such policy as a rule in 3accordance with the provisions of the Illinois Administrative 4Procedure Act. In addition, the Department shall publish each 5January in the Illinois Register a list of all game-specific 6rules, play instructions, directives, operations manuals, 7brochures, or other game-specific publications issued by the 8Department during the previous year and instructions 9concerning how the public may obtain copies of these materials 10from the Department.11(Source: P.A. 97-464, eff. 10-15-11.) 12    (20 ILCS 1605/9.1)13    Sec. 9.1. Private manager and management agreement.14    (a) As used in this Section:15    "Offeror" means a person or group of persons that responds 16to a request for qualifications under this Section.17    "Request for qualifications" means all materials and 18documents prepared by the Department to solicit the following 19from offerors:20        (1) Statements of qualifications.21        (2) Proposals to enter into a management agreement, 22    including the identity of any prospective vendor or 23    vendors that the offeror intends to initially engage to 24    assist the offeror in performing its obligations under the 25    management agreement.  HB2674- 3 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1    "Final offer" means the last proposal submitted by an 2offeror in response to the request for qualifications, 3including the identity of any prospective vendor or vendors 4that the offeror intends to initially engage to assist the 5offeror in performing its obligations under the management 6agreement. 7    "Final offeror" means the offeror ultimately selected by 8the Governor to be the private manager for the Lottery under 9subsection (h) of this Section.10    (b) (Blank). By September 15, 2010, the Governor shall 11select a private manager for the total management of the 12Lottery with integrated functions, such as lottery game 13design, supply of goods and services, and advertising and as 14specified in this Section.15    (c) (Blank). Pursuant to the terms of this subsection, the 16Department shall endeavor to expeditiously terminate the 17existing contracts in support of the Lottery in effect on July 1813, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 96-37) in 19connection with the selection of the private manager. As part 20of its obligation to terminate these contracts and select the 21private manager, the Department shall establish a mutually 22agreeable timetable to transfer the functions of existing 23contractors to the private manager so that existing Lottery 24operations are not materially diminished or impaired during 25the transition. To that end, the Department shall do the 26following:  HB2674- 4 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1        (1) where such contracts contain a provision 2    authorizing termination upon notice, the Department shall 3    provide notice of termination to occur upon the mutually 4    agreed timetable for transfer of functions;5        (2) upon the expiration of any initial term or renewal 6    term of the current Lottery contracts, the Department 7    shall not renew such contract for a term extending beyond 8    the mutually agreed timetable for transfer of functions; 9    or10        (3) in the event any current contract provides for 11    termination of that contract upon the implementation of a 12    contract with the private manager, the Department shall 13    perform all necessary actions to terminate the contract on 14    the date that coincides with the mutually agreed timetable 15    for transfer of functions.16    If the contracts to support the current operation of the 17Lottery in effect on July 13, 2009 (the effective date of 18Public Act 96-34) are not subject to termination as provided 19for in this subsection (c), then the Department may include a 20provision in the contract with the private manager specifying 21a mutually agreeable methodology for incorporation.22    (c-5) The Department shall include provisions in the 23management agreement whereby the private manager shall, for a 24fee, and pursuant to a contract negotiated with the Department 25(the "Employee Use Contract"), utilize the services of current 26Department employees to assist in the administration and   HB2674- 5 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1operation of the Lottery. The Department shall be the employer 2of all such bargaining unit employees assigned to perform such 3work for the private manager, and such employees shall be 4State employees, as defined by the Personnel Code. Department 5employees shall operate under the same employment policies, 6rules, regulations, and procedures, as other employees of the 7Department. In addition, neither historical representation 8rights under the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act, nor 9existing collective bargaining agreements, shall be disturbed 10by the management agreement with the private manager for the 11management of the Lottery. 12    (d) The management agreement with the private manager 13shall include all of the following:14        (1) A term not to exceed 10 years, including any 15    renewals.16        (2) A provision specifying that the Department:17            (A) shall exercise actual control over all 18        significant business decisions; 19            (A-5) has the authority to direct or countermand 20        operating decisions by the private manager at any 21        time;22            (B) has ready access at any time to information 23        regarding Lottery operations;24            (C) has the right to demand and receive 25        information from the private manager concerning any 26        aspect of the Lottery operations at any time; and  HB2674- 6 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1            (D) retains ownership of all trade names, 2        trademarks, and intellectual property associated with 3        the Lottery.4        (3) A provision imposing an affirmative duty on the 5    private manager to provide the Department with material 6    information and with any information the private manager 7    reasonably believes the Department would want to know to 8    enable the Department to conduct the Lottery.9        (4) A provision requiring the private manager to 10    provide the Department with advance notice of any 11    operating decision that bears significantly on the public 12    interest, including, but not limited to, decisions on the 13    kinds of games to be offered to the public and decisions 14    affecting the relative risk and reward of the games being 15    offered, so the Department has a reasonable opportunity to 16    evaluate and countermand that decision.17        (5) A provision providing for compensation of the 18    private manager that may consist of, among other things, a 19    fee for services and a performance based bonus as 20    consideration for managing the Lottery, including terms 21    that may provide the private manager with an increase in 22    compensation if Lottery revenues grow by a specified 23    percentage in a given year.24        (6) (Blank).25        (7) A provision requiring the deposit of all Lottery 26    proceeds to be deposited into the State Lottery Fund   HB2674- 7 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1    except as otherwise provided in Section 20 of this Act.2        (8) A provision requiring the private manager to 3    locate its principal office within the State.4        (8-5) A provision encouraging that, pursuant to 5    Section 4 of the Business Enterprise for Minorities, 6    Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act, at least 20% of 7    the cost of contracts entered into for goods and services 8    by the private manager in connection with its management 9    of the Lottery, other than contracts with sales agents or 10    technical advisors, be awarded to businesses that are a 11    minority-owned business, a women-owned business, or a 12    business owned by a person with disability, as those terms 13    are defined in the Business Enterprise for Minorities, 14    Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act. 15        (9) A requirement that so long as the private manager 16    complies with all the conditions of the agreement under 17    the oversight of the Department, the private manager shall 18    have the following duties and obligations with respect to 19    the management of the Lottery:20            (A) The right to use equipment and other assets 21        used in the operation of the Lottery.22            (B) The rights and obligations under contracts 23        with retailers and vendors.24            (C) The implementation of a comprehensive security 25        program by the private manager.26            (D) The implementation of a comprehensive system   HB2674- 8 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1        of internal audits.2            (E) The implementation of a program by the private 3        manager to curb compulsive gambling by persons playing 4        the Lottery.5            (F) A system for determining (i) the type of 6        Lottery games, (ii) the method of selecting winning 7        tickets, (iii) the manner of payment of prizes to 8        holders of winning tickets, (iv) the frequency of 9        drawings of winning tickets, (v) the method to be used 10        in selling tickets, (vi) a system for verifying the 11        validity of tickets claimed to be winning tickets, 12        (vii) the basis upon which retailer commissions are 13        established by the manager, and (viii) minimum 14        payouts.15        (10) A requirement that advertising and promotion must 16    be consistent with Section 7.8a of this Act.17        (11) A requirement that the private manager market the 18    Lottery to those residents who are new, infrequent, or 19    lapsed players of the Lottery, especially those who are 20    most likely to make regular purchases on the Internet as 21    permitted by law.22        (12) A code of ethics for the private manager's 23    officers and employees.24        (13) A requirement that the Department monitor and 25    oversee the private manager's practices and take action 26    that the Department considers appropriate to ensure that   HB2674- 9 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1    the private manager is in compliance with the terms of the 2    management agreement, while allowing the manager, unless 3    specifically prohibited by law or the management 4    agreement, to negotiate and sign its own contracts with 5    vendors.6        (14) A provision requiring the private manager to 7    periodically file, at least on an annual basis, 8    appropriate financial statements in a form and manner 9    acceptable to the Department.10        (15) Cash reserves requirements.11        (16) Procedural requirements for obtaining the prior 12    approval of the Department when a management agreement or 13    an interest in a management agreement is sold, assigned, 14    transferred, or pledged as collateral to secure financing.15        (17) Grounds for the termination of the management 16    agreement by the Department or the private manager.17        (18) Procedures for amendment of the agreement.18        (19) A provision requiring the private manager to 19    engage in an open and competitive bidding process for any 20    procurement having a cost in excess of the small purchase 21    limits under Section 20-20 of the Illinois Procurement 22    Code $50,000 that is not a part of the private manager's 23    final offer. The process shall favor the selection of a 24    vendor deemed to have submitted a proposal that provides 25    the Lottery with the best overall value. The process shall 26    not be subject to the provisions of the Illinois   HB2674- 10 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1    Procurement Code, unless specifically required by the 2    management agreement.3        (20) The transition of rights and obligations, 4    including any associated equipment or other assets used in 5    the operation of the Lottery, from the manager to any 6    successor manager of the lottery, including the 7    Department, following the termination of or foreclosure 8    upon the management agreement.9        (21) Right of use of copyrights, trademarks, and 10    service marks held by the Department in the name of the 11    State. The agreement must provide that any use of them by 12    the manager shall only be for the purpose of fulfilling 13    its obligations under the management agreement during the 14    term of the agreement.15        (22) The disclosure of any information requested by 16    the Department to enable it to comply with the reporting 17    requirements and information requests provided for under 18    subsection (p) of this Section. 19    (e) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 20Department shall select a private manager through a 21competitive request for qualifications process consistent with 22Section 20-35 of the Illinois Procurement Code, which shall 23take into account:24        (1) the offeror's ability to market the Lottery to 25    those residents who are new, infrequent, or lapsed players 26    of the Lottery, especially those who are most likely to   HB2674- 11 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1    make regular purchases on the Internet;2        (2) the offeror's ability to address the State's 3    concern with the social effects of gambling on those who 4    can least afford to do so;5        (3) the offeror's ability to provide the most 6    successful management of the Lottery for the benefit of 7    the people of the State based on current and past business 8    practices or plans of the offeror; and9        (4) the offeror's poor or inadequate past performance 10    in servicing, equipping, operating or managing a lottery 11    on behalf of Illinois, another State or foreign government 12    and attracting persons who are not currently regular 13    players of a lottery.14    (f) The Department may retain the services of an advisor 15or advisors with significant experience in financial services 16or the management, operation, and procurement of goods, 17services, and equipment for a government-run lottery to assist 18in the preparation of the terms of the request for 19qualifications and selection of the private manager. Any 20prospective advisor seeking to provide services under this 21subsection (f) shall disclose any material business or 22financial relationship during the past 3 years with any 23potential offeror, or with a contractor or subcontractor 24presently providing goods, services, or equipment to the 25Department to support the Lottery. The Department shall 26evaluate the material business or financial relationship of   HB2674- 12 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1each prospective advisor. The Department shall not select any 2prospective advisor with a substantial business or financial 3relationship that the Department deems to impair the 4objectivity of the services to be provided by the prospective 5advisor. During the course of the advisor's engagement by the 6Department, and for a period of one year thereafter, the 7advisor shall not enter into any business or financial 8relationship with any offeror or any vendor identified to 9assist an offeror in performing its obligations under the 10management agreement. Any advisor retained by the Department 11shall be disqualified from being an offeror. The Department 12shall not include terms in the request for qualifications that 13provide a material advantage whether directly or indirectly to 14any potential offeror, or any contractor or subcontractor 15presently providing goods, services, or equipment to the 16Department to support the Lottery, including terms contained 17in previous responses to requests for proposals or 18qualifications submitted to Illinois, another State or foreign 19government when those terms are uniquely associated with a 20particular potential offeror, contractor, or subcontractor. 21The request for proposals offered by the Department on 22December 22, 2008 as "LOT08GAMESYS" and reference number 23"22016176" is declared void.24    (g) The Department shall select at least 2 offerors as 25finalists to potentially serve as the private manager no later 26than August 9, 2010. Upon making preliminary selections, the   HB2674- 13 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1Department shall schedule a public hearing on the finalists' 2proposals and provide public notice of the hearing at least 7 3calendar days before the hearing. The notice must include all 4of the following:5        (1) The date, time, and place of the hearing.6        (2) The subject matter of the hearing.7        (3) A brief description of the management agreement to 8    be awarded.9        (4) The identity of the offerors that have been 10    selected as finalists to serve as the private manager.11        (5) The address and telephone number of the 12    Department.13    (h) At the public hearing, the Department shall (i) 14provide sufficient time for each finalist to present and 15explain its proposal to the Department and the Governor or the 16Governor's designee, including an opportunity to respond to 17questions posed by the Department, Governor, or designee and 18(ii) allow the public and non-selected offerors to comment on 19the presentations. The Governor or a designee shall attend the 20public hearing. After the public hearing, the Department shall 21have 14 calendar days to recommend to the Governor whether a 22management agreement should be entered into with a particular 23finalist. After reviewing the Department's recommendation, the 24Governor may accept or reject the Department's recommendation, 25and shall select a final offeror as the private manager by 26publication of a notice in the Illinois Procurement Bulletin   HB2674- 14 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1on or before September 15, 2010. The Governor shall include in 2the notice a detailed explanation and the reasons why the 3final offeror is superior to other offerors and will provide 4management services in a manner that best achieves the 5objectives of this Section. The Governor shall also sign the 6management agreement with the private manager.7    (i) Any action to contest the private manager selected by 8the Governor under this Section must be brought within 7 9calendar days after the publication of the notice of the 10designation of the private manager as provided in subsection 11(h) of this Section.12    (j) The Lottery shall remain, for so long as a private 13manager manages the Lottery in accordance with provisions of 14this Act, a Lottery conducted by the State, and the State shall 15not be authorized to sell or transfer the Lottery to a third 16party.17    (k) Any tangible personal property used exclusively in 18connection with the lottery that is owned by the Department 19and leased to the private manager shall be owned by the 20Department in the name of the State and shall be considered to 21be public property devoted to an essential public and 22governmental function.23    (l) The Department may exercise any of its powers under 24this Section or any other law as necessary or desirable for the 25execution of the Department's powers under this Section.26    (m) Neither this Section nor any management agreement   HB2674- 15 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1entered into under this Section prohibits the General Assembly 2from authorizing forms of gambling that are not in direct 3competition with the Lottery. The forms of gambling authorized 4by Public Act 101-31 constitute authorized forms of gambling 5that are not in direct competition with the Lottery.6    (n) The private manager shall be subject to a complete 7investigation in the third, seventh, and tenth years of the 8agreement (if the agreement is for a 10-year term) by the 9Department in cooperation with the Auditor General to 10determine whether the private manager has complied with this 11Section and the management agreement. The private manager 12shall bear the cost of an investigation or reinvestigation of 13the private manager under this subsection.14    (o) The powers conferred by this Section are in addition 15and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law. If 16any other law or rule is inconsistent with this Section, 17including, but not limited to, provisions of the Illinois 18Procurement Code, then this Section controls as to any 19management agreement entered into under this Section. This 20Section and any rules adopted under this Section contain full 21and complete authority for a management agreement between the 22Department and a private manager. No law, procedure, 23proceeding, publication, notice, consent, approval, order, or 24act by the Department or any other officer, Department, 25agency, or instrumentality of the State or any political 26subdivision is required for the Department to enter into a   HB2674- 16 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1management agreement under this Section. This Section contains 2full and complete authority for the Department to approve any 3contracts entered into by a private manager with a vendor 4providing goods, services, or both goods and services to the 5private manager under the terms of the management agreement, 6including subcontractors of such vendors.7    Upon receipt of a written request from the Chief 8Procurement Officer, the Department shall provide to the Chief 9Procurement Officer a complete and un-redacted copy of the 10management agreement or any contract that is subject to the 11Department's approval authority under this subsection (o). The 12Department shall provide a copy of the agreement or contract 13to the Chief Procurement Officer in the time specified by the 14Chief Procurement Officer in his or her written request, but 15no later than 5 business days after the request is received by 16the Department. The Chief Procurement Officer must retain any 17portions of the management agreement or of any contract 18designated by the Department as confidential, proprietary, or 19trade secret information in complete confidence pursuant to 20subsection (g) of Section 7 of the Freedom of Information Act. 21The Department shall also provide the Chief Procurement 22Officer with reasonable advance written notice of any contract 23that is pending Department approval. 24    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section to the 25contrary, the Chief Procurement Officer shall adopt 26administrative rules, including emergency rules, to establish   HB2674- 17 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1a procurement process to select a successor private manager if 2a private management agreement has been terminated. The 3selection process shall at a minimum take into account the 4criteria set forth in items (1) through (4) of subsection (e) 5of this Section and may include provisions consistent with 6subsections (f), (g), (h), and (i) of this Section. The Chief 7Procurement Officer shall also implement and administer the 8adopted selection process upon the termination of a private 9management agreement. The Department, after the Chief 10Procurement Officer certifies that the procurement process has 11been followed in accordance with the rules adopted under this 12subsection (o), shall select a final offeror as the private 13manager and sign the management agreement with the private 14manager. 15    Through June 30, 2022, except as provided in Sections 1621.5, 21.6, 21.7, 21.8, 21.9, 21.10, 21.11, 21.12, and 21.13 17of this Act and Section 25-70 of the Sports Wagering Act, the 18Department shall distribute all proceeds of lottery tickets 19and shares sold in the following priority and manner:20        (1) The payment of prizes and retailer bonuses.21        (2) The payment of costs incurred in the operation and 22    administration of the Lottery, including the payment of 23    sums due to the private manager under the management 24    agreement with the Department.25        (3) On the last day of each month or as soon thereafter 26    as possible, the State Comptroller shall direct and the   HB2674- 18 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1    State Treasurer shall transfer from the State Lottery Fund 2    to the Common School Fund an amount that is equal to the 3    proceeds transferred in the corresponding month of fiscal 4    year 2009, as adjusted for inflation, to the Common School 5    Fund.6        (4) On or before September 30 of each fiscal year, 7    deposit any estimated remaining proceeds from the prior 8    fiscal year, subject to payments under items (1), (2), and 9    (3), into the Capital Projects Fund. Beginning in fiscal 10    year 2019, the amount deposited shall be increased or 11    decreased each year by the amount the estimated payment 12    differs from the amount determined from each year-end 13    financial audit. Only remaining net deficits from prior 14    fiscal years may reduce the requirement to deposit these 15    funds, as determined by the annual financial audit.16    Beginning July 1, 2022, the Department shall distribute 17all proceeds of lottery tickets and shares sold in the manner 18and priority described in Section 9.3 of this Act, except that 19the Department shall make the deposit into the Capital 20Projects Fund that would have occurred under item (4) of this 21subsection (o) on or before September 30, 2022, but for the 22changes made to this subsection by Public Act 102-699. 23    (p) The Department shall be subject to the following 24reporting and information request requirements:25        (1) the Department shall submit written quarterly 26    reports to the Governor and the General Assembly on the   HB2674- 19 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1    activities and actions of the private manager selected 2    under this Section;3        (2) upon request of the Chief Procurement Officer, the 4    Department shall promptly produce information related to 5    the procurement activities of the Department and the 6    private manager requested by the Chief Procurement 7    Officer; the Chief Procurement Officer must retain 8    confidential, proprietary, or trade secret information 9    designated by the Department in complete confidence 10    pursuant to subsection (g) of Section 7 of the Freedom of 11    Information Act; and12        (3) at least 30 days prior to the beginning of the 13    Department's fiscal year, the Department shall prepare an 14    annual written report on the activities of the private 15    manager selected under this Section and deliver that 16    report to the Governor and General Assembly.17(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 18101-561, eff. 8-23-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-699, eff. 194-19-22; 102-1115, eff. 1-9-23.) 20    (20 ILCS 1605/10.1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1160.1)21    Sec. 10.1. The following are ineligible for any license 22under this Act: 23        (a) any person who has been convicted of a felony;24        (b) any person who is or has been a professional 25    gambler or gambling promoter;  HB2674- 20 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1        (c) any person who has engaged in bookmaking or other 2    forms of illegal gambling;3        (d) any person who is not of good character and 4    reputation in the community in which he resides;5        (e) any person who has been found guilty of any fraud 6    or misrepresentation in any connection;7        (f) any firm or corporation in which a person defined 8    in item (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) has a proprietary, 9    equitable or credit interest of 5% or more; .10        (g) any organization in which a person defined in item 11    (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) is an officer, director, or 12    managing agent, whether compensated or not; and 13        (h) any organization in which a person defined in item 14    (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) is to participate in the 15    management or sales of lottery tickets or shares.16    However, with respect to persons defined in (a), the 17Department may grant any such person a license under this Act 18when:19        1) at least 10 years have elapsed since the date when 20    the sentence for the most recent such conviction was 21    satisfactorily completed;22        2) the applicant has no history of criminal activity 23    subsequent to such conviction;24        3) the applicant has complied with all conditions of 25    probation, conditional discharge, supervision, parole or 26    mandatory supervised release; and  HB2674- 21 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1        4) the applicant presents at least 3 letters of 2    recommendation from responsible citizens in his community 3    who personally can attest that the character and attitude 4    of the applicant indicate that he is unlikely to commit 5    another crime.6    The Department may revoke, without notice or a hearing, 7the license of any agent who violates this Act or any rule or 8regulation promulgated pursuant to this Act. However, if the 9Department does revoke a license without notice and an 10opportunity for a hearing, the Department shall, by 11appropriate notice, afford the person whose license has been 12revoked an opportunity for a hearing within 30 days after the 13revocation order has been issued. As a result of any such 14hearing, the Department may confirm its action in revoking the 15license, or it may order the restoration of such license.16(Source: P.A. 97-464, eff. 10-15-11.) 17    (20 ILCS 1605/10.6)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1160.6)18    Sec. 10.6. The Department shall make an effort to more 19directly inform players of the odds of winning prizes by 20publishing the information for all games on the Department's 21public website. This effort shall include, at a minimum, that 22the Department require all ticket agents to display a placard 23stating the odds of winning for each game offered by that 24agent.25(Source: P.A. 97-464, eff. 10-15-11.)   HB2674- 22 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1    (20 ILCS 1605/19)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1169)2    Sec. 19. The Department shall establish an appropriate 3period for the claiming of prizes for each lottery game 4offered. Each claim period shall be stated in game rules and 5written play instructions issued by the Director in accordance 6with Section 7.1 of this Act. Written play instructions shall 7be made available on the Department's public website or by the 8Department by request to all players through sales agents 9licensed to sell game tickets or shares. Prizes for lottery 10games which involve the purchase of a physical lottery ticket 11may be claimed only by presentation of a valid winning lottery 12ticket that matches validation records on file with the 13Lottery; no claim may be honored which is based on the 14assertion that the ticket was lost or stolen. No lottery 15ticket which has been altered, mutilated, or fails to pass 16validation tests shall be deemed to be a winning ticket.17    If no claim is made for the money within the established 18claim period, the prize may be included in the prize pool of 19such special drawing or drawings as the Department may, from 20time to time, designate. Unclaimed multi-state game prize 21money may be included in the multi-state prize pool for such 22special drawing or drawings as the multi-state game directors 23may, from time to time, designate. Any bonuses offered by the 24Department to sales agents who sell winning tickets or shares 25shall be payable to such agents regardless of whether or not   HB2674- 23 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1the prize money on the ticket or share is claimed, provided 2that the agent can be identified as the vendor of the winning 3ticket or share, and that the winning ticket or share was sold 4on or after January 1, 1984. All unclaimed prize money not 5included in the prize pool of a special drawing shall be 6transferred to the Common School Fund.7(Source: P.A. 97-464, eff. 10-15-11; 98-499, eff. 8-16-13.) 8    (20 ILCS 1605/20)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1170)9    Sec. 20. State Lottery Fund. 10    (a) There is created in the State Treasury a special fund 11to be known as the State Lottery Fund. Such fund shall consist 12of all revenues received from (1) the sale of lottery tickets 13or shares, (net of commissions, fees representing those 14expenses that are directly proportionate to the sale of 15tickets or shares at the agent location, and prizes of less 16than $600 or less which have been validly paid at the agent 17level), (2) application fees, and (3) all other sources 18including moneys credited or transferred thereto from any 19other fund or source pursuant to law. Interest earnings of the 20State Lottery Fund shall be credited to the Common School 21Fund.22    (a-5) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 2321.4 of this Act shall be in accordance with Section 21.4. 24    (b) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 2521.5 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.5.   HB2674- 24 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1    (c) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 221.6 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.6.3    (d) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 421.7 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.7. 5    (e) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 621.8 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.8. 7    (f) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 821.9 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.9. 9    (g) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1021.10 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.10. 11    (h) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1221.11 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.11. 13    (i) (Blank). 14    (j) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1521.13 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.13.16    (k) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1725-70 of the Sports Wagering Act shall be in accordance with 18Section 25-70 of the Sports Wagering Act. 19    (l) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 2021.15 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.15. 21    (m) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 2221.16 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.16.23(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-381, eff. 7-28-23.) 24    (20 ILCS 1605/20.1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1170.1)25    Sec. 20.1. Department account.   HB2674- 25 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1    (a) The Department is authorized to pay validated prizes 2up to $25,000 from funds held by the Department in an account 3separate and apart from all public moneys of the State. Moneys 4in this account shall be administered by the Director 5exclusively for the purposes of issuing payments to prize 6winners authorized by this Section. Moneys in this account 7shall be deposited by the Department into the Public 8Treasurers' Investment Pool established under Section 17 of 9the State Treasurer Act. The Department shall submit vouchers 10from time to time as needed for reimbursement of this account 11from moneys appropriated for prizes from the State Lottery 12Fund. Investment income earned from this account shall be 13deposited monthly by the Department into the Common School 14Fund. The Department shall file quarterly fiscal reports 15specifying the activity of this account as required under 16Section 16 of the State Comptroller Act, and shall file 17quarterly with the General Assembly, the Auditor General, the 18Comptroller, and the State Treasurer a report indicating the 19costs associated with this activity.20    (b) The Department is authorized to enter into an 21interagency agreement with the Office of the Comptroller or 22any other State agency to establish responsibilities, duties, 23and procedures for complying with the Comptroller's Offset 24System under Section 10.05 of the State Comptroller Act. All 25federal and State tax reporting and withholding requirements 26relating to prize winners under this Section shall be the   HB2674- 26 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1responsibility of the Department. Moneys from this account may 2not be used to pay amounts to deferred prize winners. Moneys 3may not be transferred from the State Lottery Fund to this 4account for payment of prizes under this Section until 5procedures are implemented to comply with the Comptroller's 6Offset System and sufficient internal controls are in place to 7validate prizes.8(Source: P.A. 97-464, eff. 10-15-11; 98-499, eff. 8-16-13.) 9    (20 ILCS 1605/24)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1174)10    Sec. 24. The State Comptroller shall conduct a preaudit of 11all accounts and transactions of the Department in connection 12with the operation of the State Lottery under the State 13Comptroller Act, excluding payments issued by the Department 14for prizes of $25,000 or less.15    The Auditor General or a certified public accountant firm 16appointed by him shall conduct an annual post-audit of all 17accounts and transactions of the Department in connection with 18the operation of the State Lottery and other special post 19audits as the Auditor General, the Legislative Audit 20Commission, or the General Assembly deems necessary. The 21annual post-audits shall include payments made by lottery 22sales agents of prizes of less than $600 or less authorized 23under Section 20, and payments made by the Department of 24prizes up to $25,000 authorized under Section 20.1. The 25Auditor General or his agent conducting an audit under this   HB2674- 27 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1Act shall have access and authority to examine any and all 2records of the Department or the Board, its distributing 3agents and its licensees.4(Source: P.A. 94-776, eff. 5-19-06.) 5    (20 ILCS 1605/27)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1177)6    Sec. 27. (a) The Department may State Treasurer may, with 7the consent of the Director, contract with any person or 8corporation, including, without limitation, a bank, banking 9house, trust company or investment banking firm, to perform 10such financial functions, activities or services in connection 11with operation of the lottery. The State Treasurer may, with 12the consent of the Director, act as an agent of the Department 13to perform the financial functions as the Director may 14prescribe as the State Treasurer and the Director may 15prescribe.16    (b) All proceeds from investments made pursuant to 17contracts executed by the Department or the State Treasurer, 18with the consent of the Director, to perform financial 19functions, activities or services in connection with operation 20of the lottery, shall be deposited and held by the State 21Treasurer as ex-officio custodian thereof, separate and apart 22from all public money or funds of this State in a special trust 23fund outside the State treasury. Such trust fund shall be 24known as the "Deferred Lottery Prize Winners Trust Fund", and 25shall be administered by the Director.  HB2674- 28 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1    The Director shall, at such times and in such amounts as 2shall be necessary, prepare and send to the State Comptroller 3vouchers requesting payment from the Deferred Lottery Prize 4Winners Trust Fund to deferred prize winners, in a manner that 5will insure the timely payment of such amounts owed.6    This Act shall constitute an irrevocable appropriation of 7all amounts necessary for that purpose, and the irrevocable 8and continuing authority for and direction to the Director and 9the State Treasurer to make the necessary payments out of such 10trust fund for that purpose.11    (c) Moneys invested pursuant to subsection (a) of this 12Section may be invested only in bonds, notes, certificates of 13indebtedness, treasury bills, or other securities constituting 14direct obligations of the United States of America and all 15securities or obligations the prompt payment of principal and 16interest of which is guaranteed by a pledge of the full faith 17and credit of the United States of America. Interest earnings 18on moneys in the Deferred Lottery Prize Winners Trust Fund 19shall remain in such fund and be used to pay the winners of 20lottery prizes deferred as to payment until such obligations 21are discharged. Proceeds from bonds purchased and interest 22accumulated as a result of a grand prize multi-state game 23ticket that goes unclaimed will be transferred after the 24termination of the relevant claim period directly from the 25lottery's Deferred Lottery Prize Winners Trust Fund to each 26respective multi-state partner state according to its   HB2674- 29 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1contribution ratio.2    (c-5) If a deferred lottery prize is not claimed within 3the claim period established by game rule, then the securities 4or other instruments purchased to fund the prize shall be 5liquidated and the liquidated amount shall be transferred to 6the State Lottery Fund for disposition pursuant to Section 19 7of this Act.8    (c-10) The Director may use a portion of the moneys in the 9Deferred Lottery Prize Winners Trust Fund to purchase bonds to 10pay a lifetime prize if the prize duration exceeds the length 11of available securities. If the winner of a lifetime prize 12exceeds his or her life expectancy as determined using 13actuarial assumptions and the securities or moneys set aside 14to pay the prize have been exhausted, moneys in the State 15Lottery Fund shall be used to make payments to the winner for 16the duration of the winner's life.17    (c-15) From time to time, the Director may request that 18the State Comptroller transfer any excess moneys in the 19Deferred Lottery Prize Winners Trust Fund to the State Lottery 20Fund.21    (d) This amendatory Act of 1985 shall be construed 22liberally to effect the purposes of the Illinois Lottery Law.23(Source: P.A. 97-464, eff. 10-15-11; 98-463, eff. 8-16-13; 2498-499, eff. 8-16-13.)  HB2674- 30 -LRB104 08891 LNS 18946 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 1605/7.1from Ch. 120, par. 1157.14    20 ILCS 1605/9.15    20 ILCS 1605/10.1from Ch. 120, par. 1160.16    20 ILCS 1605/10.6from Ch. 120, par. 1160.67    20 ILCS 1605/19from Ch. 120, par. 11698    20 ILCS 1605/20from Ch. 120, par. 11709    20 ILCS 1605/20.1from Ch. 120, par. 1170.110    20 ILCS 1605/24from Ch. 120, par. 117411    20 ILCS 1605/27from Ch. 120, par. 1177